Hawaii statutes.
[§489D-18] Maintenance of records.
(a) Each licensee shall make, keep, preserve, and make available for
inspection by the commissioner the following books, accounts, and other records
for a period of three years:

(1) A record or records of each payment instrument;

(2) A general ledger containing all assets,
liability, capital, income, and expense accounts that shall be posted at least
monthly;

(3) Bank statements and bank reconciliation records;

(4) Records of outstanding payment instruments;

(5) Records of each payment instrument paid within
the three-year period;

(6) A list of the names and addresses of all of the
licensee's authorized delegates; and

(7) Any other records the commissioner reasonably
requires by rule adopted pursuant to chapter 91.

(b) Maintenance of documents in a
photographic, electronic, or other similar form shall comply with this section.

(c) Records may be maintained at a location
outside the State; provided that these records are made accessible to the
commissioner within seven business days of receipt of a written notice issued
by the commissioner. [L 2006, c 153, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next